District of Columbia statutes.
48-903.07

Order forms.

Controlled substances in Schedule I or II shall be distributed by a registrant to another registrant only pursuant to an order form. Compliance with the provisions of federal law respecting order forms shall be deemed compliance with this section.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, title III, § 307, 28 DCR 3081
This section is referenced in § 48-904.03.
1981 Ed., § 33-537.